New York, session 2025-2026, S684.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1, paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 and subdivi- 2 sion 4 of section 3502 of the public health law, as added by chapter 175 3 of the laws of 2006, are amended to read as follows: 4 1. The department shall issue separate licenses in the areas of radi- 5 ography, radiation therapy and nuclear medicine technology to individ- 6 uals who qualify under section thirty-five hundred five of this title. 7 The department shall issue limited-scope radiographer licenses to indi- 8 viduals who qualify under sections thirty-five hundred three and thir- 9 ty-five hundred five of this title. 10 (c) only persons licensed under this article shall practice radiogra- 11 phy, radiation therapy or nuclear medicine technology or use the title 12 "limited-scope radiographer," "radiographer," "radiologic technologist," 13 "radiation therapist" or "nuclear medicine technologist" or use the 14 abbreviations LRT, RTT, LRTT, NMT, or LNMT with [his or her] such 15 person's name; and 16 4. No radiologic technologist shall administer or inject intravenous 17 contrast media unless (a) the individual is certified by the department 18 to perform such function in accordance with the commissioner's rules and 19 regulations (b) such administration or injection has been approved by a 20 physician, physician's assistant, nurse practitioner or registered 21 professional nurse within twenty-four hours prior to the administration EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02747-02-6 S. 684--A 2 1 or injection (c) a physician, physician's assistant, nurse practitioner 2 or registered professional nurse performs an evaluation of the patient 3 on the day of the procedure. Administration or injection of contrast 4 media means and is limited to the placement or insertion of a needle or 5 a catheter, not exceeding three inches in length and not above the level 6 of the axilla into a person's upper extremity and the administration or 7 injection of the intravenous contrast media, manually or by mechanical 8 injector, but does not mean the determination of the type or volume of 9 media to be administered or injected. Limited-scope radiographers shall 10 not be authorized under this article to inject intravenous contrast 11 media. 12 § 2. Subdivision 17 of section 3501 of the public health law, as added 13 by chapter 175 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 14 17. "Supervision" means the oversight of a licensed radiologic tech- 15 nologist or a limited-scope radiographer, as applicable, by a licensed 16 practitioner acting within the limits specified in the law under which 17 the practitioner is licensed. 18 § 3. Section 3501 of the public health law is amended by adding two 19 new subdivisions 4-a and 13 to read as follows: 20 4-a. "Limited-scope radiographer" shall mean a person licensed pursu- 21 ant to section thirty-five hundred three of this article to practice 22 radiography limited to chest, extremities, skull/sinus, and spine/sacrum 23 at urgent care centers. The limited-scope radiographer shall not utilize 24 fluoroscopy. 25 13. "Urgent care center" shall mean any medical practice location that 26 provides immediate and on-site evaluation, diagnosis, and treatment of 27 non-emergent, acute illnesses or injuries during posted hours of opera- 28 tion, primarily or exclusively on a walk-in or after-hours basis. 29 § 4. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 3503 to 30 read as follows: 31 § 3503. Limited-scope radiographers. 1. A license to practice as a 32 limited-scope radiographer shall authorize a holder of such license to 33 practice radiography at urgent care centers under the supervision of a 34 licensed practitioner or licensed registered radiologic technologist. 35 2. The commissioner shall establish standards that educational 36 programs in limited radiography must meet to be approved as a limited 37 radiography education program in New York state. Courses shall include, 38 at a minimum, a total of one hundred fifty hours of didactic content 39 that must address radiographic anatomy, procedures, and pathology, 40 digital image acquisition and display, fundamentals, ethics, and laws of 41 healthcare, human anatomy and physiology, image production and analysis, 42 imaging equipment and radiation production, medical terminology, and 43 patient care. A minimum of two hundred forty hours of clinical training 44 must also be incorporated that includes a minimum of five clinical 45 competencies, in each anatomical area that the limited-scope radiogra- 46 pher will image, performed under direct supervision of a radiologic 47 technologist. Upon completion of the course, successful completion of a 48 standardized accreditation examination that assesses the knowledge and 49 cognitive skills underlying the intelligent performance of the tasks 50 typically required of a limited-scope radiographer is required. Any 51 such course or accrediting examination shall be approved by the commis- 52 sioner and no person, institution or agency shall offer a course of 53 study in limited-scope radiography unless such course of study is regis- 54 tered by the department or by the department of education and meets such 55 standards of quality, character and competence of sponsors and offi- 56 cials, financial resources, public need, and other pertinent matters as S. 684--A 3 1 may be prescribed by the commissioner or by the commissioner of educa- 2 tion in appropriate rules and regulations. 3 3. The commissioner shall establish a registration process by which 4 individuals may submit an application to the commissioner to be licensed 5 as a limited-scope radiographer pursuant to this section. Such registra- 6 tion process and application shall be consistent with the provisions of 7 section thirty-five hundred seven of this title and shall include: 8 (a) an attestation that the applicant has completed an approved course 9 and accrediting examination pursuant to subdivision two of this section, 10 and received a passing score on such accrediting examination as deter- 11 mined by the commissioner; and 12 (b) any other information as may be required by the commissioner. 13 4. The commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate any rules and/or 14 regulations necessary for the effective implementation of this section. 15 § 5. The opening paragraph and paragraphs (d), (f) and (p) of subdivi- 16 sion 1 of section 3510 of the public health law, the opening paragraph 17 as amended and paragraph (p) as added by section 97 of part E of chapter 18 56 of the laws of 2013, and paragraphs (d) and (f) as added by chapter 19 175 of the laws of 2006, are amended to read as follows: 20 The license, registration or intravenous contrast administration 21 certificate of a radiologic technologist, or license to practice as a 22 limited-scope radiographer, may be suspended for a fixed period, revoked 23 or annulled, or such licensee censured, reprimanded, subject to a civil 24 penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars for every such violation, or 25 otherwise disciplined, in accordance with the provisions and procedures 26 defined in this article, provided that no civil penalty shall be 27 assessed for any crime or misconduct that occurred outside the jurisdic- 28 tion of New York state upon decision after due hearing that the individ- 29 ual is guilty of the following misconduct: 30 (d) aiding and abetting in the practice of radiologic technology a 31 person who is not a registered radiologic technologist or limited-scope 32 radiographer or who is practicing a form of radiologic technology which 33 is beyond the scope of the individual's license; 34 (f) falsely impersonating a duly registered radiologic technologist or 35 limited-scope radiographer or former duly registered radiologic technol- 36 ogist or limited-scope radiographer, or is practicing radiologic tech- 37 nology under an assumed name; 38 (p) having [his or her] such person's license to practice as a radio- 39 logic technologist or limited-scope radiographer revoked, suspended or 40 having other disciplinary action taken, or having [his or her] such 41 person's application for a license refused, revoked or suspended or 42 having voluntarily or otherwise surrendered [his or her] such person's 43 license after a disciplinary action was instituted by a duly authorized 44 professional disciplinary agency of another state, where the conduct 45 resulting in the revocation, suspension or other disciplinary action 46 involving the license or refusal, revocation or suspension of an appli- 47 cation for a license or the surrender of the license would, if committed 48 in New York state, constitute professional misconduct under the laws of 49 New York state. A radiologic technologist or limited-scope radiographer 50 licensed in New York state who is also licensed or seeking licensure in 51 another state must immediately report to the department any revocation, 52 suspension or other disciplinary action involving the out-of-state 53 license or refusal, revocation or suspension of an application for an 54 out-of-state license or the surrender of the out-of-state license. 55 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.